California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(10) Consultation with a physician and surgeon does not alone create a physician-patient
 relationship or any other relationship with the physician and surgeon. The certified nurse-midwife shall inform the patient that certified nurse-midwife is independently licensed and practicing midwifery and in that regard is solely responsible for the services the certified nurse-midwife provides.

(b) The disclosure and consent shall be signed by both the certified nurse-midwife and the patient and a copy of the disclosure and consent shall be placed in the patient’s medical record.

(c) The Nurse-Midwifery Advisory Committee, in consultation with the board, may recommend to the board the form for the written disclosure and informed consent statement required to be used by a certified nurse-midwife under this section.

(d) This section shall not apply when the intended site of birth is the hospital setting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 88, Sec. 7.   (SB 1237)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.55.

(a) For all maternal or neonatal transfers to the hospital setting during labor or the immediate postpartum period, for which the intended place of birth was an out-of-hospital setting at the onset of labor, or for any maternal, fetal, or neonatal death that occurred in the out-of-hospital setting during labor or the immediate postpartum period, and for which the intended birth care provider is a certified nurse-midwife in the out-of-hospital setting, the department shall collect, and the certified nurse-midwife shall be required to submit, within 90 days of the transfer or death, the following data in the form determined by the department. The data shall include all of the following:

(1) Attendant’s name, for the certified nurse-midwife who attended the patient at the time of transfer, or who attended the patient at the time of maternal, fetal, or neonatal death.

(2) Attendant’s license number, for the certified nurse-midwife who attended the patient at the time of transfer, or who attended the patient at the time of maternal, fetal, or neonatal death.

(3) The child’s date of delivery for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(4) The sex of the child, for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(5) The date of birth of the parent giving birth.

(6) The date of birth of the
 parent not giving birth.

(7) The residence ZIP Code of the parent giving birth.

(8) The residence county of the parent giving birth.

(9) The weight of the parent giving birth (prepregnancy weight and delivery weight of parent giving birth).

(10) The height of the parent giving birth.

(11) The race and ethnicity of the genetic parents, unless the parent declines to disclose.

(12) The obstetric estimate of gestation (completed weeks), at time of transfer.

(13) The total number of prior
 live births.

(14) The principal source of payment code for delivery.

(15) Any complications and procedures of pregnancy and concurrent illnesses up until time of transfer or death.

(16) Any complications and procedures of labor and delivery up until time of transfer or death.

(17) Any abnormal conditions and clinical procedures related to the newborn up until time of transfer or death.

(18) Fetal presentation at birth, or up until time of transfer.

(19) Whether this pregnancy is a multiple pregnancy (more than one fetus this pregnancy).

(20) Whether the patient has had a previous cesarean section.

(21) If the patient had a previous cesarean, indicate how many.

(22) The intended place of birth at the onset of labor, including, but not limited to, home, freestanding birth center, hospital, clinic, doctor’s office, or other location.

(23) Whether there was a maternal death.

(24) Whether there was a fetal death.

(25) Whether there was a neonatal death.

(26) Hospital transfer during the intrapartum or postpartum period,
 including, who was transferred (mother, infant, or both) and the complications, abnormal conditions, or other indications that resulted in the transfer.

(27) The name of the transfer hospital, or other hospital identification method as required, such as the hospital identification number.

(28) The county of the transfer hospital.

(29) The ZIP Code of the transfer hospital.

(30) The date of the transfer.

(31) Other information as prescribed by the State Department of Public Health.

(b) In the event of a maternal, fetal, or neonatal death that occurred
 in an out-of-hospital setting during labor or the immediate postpartum period, a certified nurse-midwife shall submit to the department, within 90 days of the death, all of the following data in addition to the data required in subdivision (a):

(1) The date of the maternal, neonatal, or fetal death.

(2) The place of delivery, for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(3) The county of the place of delivery, for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(4) The ZIP Code of the place of delivery, for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(5) The APGAR scores, for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(6) The birthweight, for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(7) The method of delivery, for births attended by the nurse-midwife.

(c) The data submitted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be in addition to the certificate of live birth information required pursuant to Sections 102425 and 102426 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) For those cases that involve a hospital transfer, the department shall link the data submitted by the certified nurse-midwife, pursuant to subdivision (a), to the live birth data reported by hospitals to the department, pursuant to Sections 102425 and 102426 of the Health and Safety Code, and to the patient
 discharge data that reflects the birth hospitalization and reported by hospitals to the Department of Health Care Access and Information, so that additional data reflecting the outcome can be incorporated into the aggregated reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (i).

(e) The department may adjust, improve, or expand the data elements required to be reported pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) to better coordinate with other data collection and reporting systems, or in order to collect more accurate data, as long as the minimum data elements in subdivisions (a) and (b) are preserved.

(f) The department shall treat the information and data gathered pursuant to this section, for the creation of the reports described in subdivision (i), as confidential records, and shall not permit the disclosure
 of any patient or certified nurse-midwife information to any law enforcement or regulatory agency for any purpose, including, but not limited to, investigations for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes. This subdivision shall not prevent the department from responding to inquiries from the Board of Registered Nursing as to whether a licensee has reported pursuant to this section.

(g) The information collected by the department pursuant to this section, and not otherwise subject to current confidentiality requirements, shall be treated as confidential records and shall only be made available for use consistent with paragraph (1) of, paragraph (4) of, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8) of, subdivision (a) of Section 102430 of the Health and Safety Code and pursuant to the application, review, and approval process established
 by the department pursuant to Section 102465 of the Health Safety Code.

(h) At the time of each certified nurse-midwife’s license renewal, the Board of Registered Nursing shall send a written notification to the certified nurse-midwife notifying them of the mandated vital records reporting requirements for out-of-hospital births pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) and Section 102415 of the Health and Safety Code and that a violation of this section shall subject the certified nurse-midwife to disciplinary or administrative action by the board.

(i) (1) The department shall report to the Legislature on the data collected pursuant to this section. The report shall include the aggregate information, including, but not limited to, birth outcomes of
 patients under the care of a certified nurse-midwife in an out-of-hospital setting at the onset of labor, collected pursuant to this section and Sections 102425 and 102426 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The first report, to reflect a 12-month period of time, shall be submitted no later than four and one-half years after the State Department of Public Health receives an appropriation as specified in subdivision (m) and each subsequent report reflecting a 12-month reporting period shall be submitted annually to the Legislature every year thereafter.

(3) A report required under this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(j) All reports, including those submitted to the Legislature
 or made publicly available, shall utilize standard public health reporting practices for accurate dissemination of these data elements, specifically in regards to the reporting of small numbers in a way that does not risk a confidentiality or other disclosure breach. No identifying information in regards to the patient or the nurse-midwife shall be disclosed in the reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (i).

(k) A violation of this section shall subject the certified nurse-midwife to disciplinary or administrative action by the Board of Registered Nursing.

(l) For purposes of this section, “department” means the State Department of Public Health.

(m) This section shall become operative only upon the Legislature
 making an appropriation to implement the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 14.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.6.

(a) The board shall not suspend or revoke a certificate to practice nurse-midwifery solely for performing an abortion if the holder performed the abortion in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Sections 141, 480, 490, and 2761, the board shall not deny an application for certification as a certified nurse-midwife, or suspend, revoke, or otherwise impose discipline upon a person certified in this state to practice nurse-midwifery under either of the
 following circumstances:

(1) The person is licensed or certified to practice nurse-midwifery in another state and was disciplined in that state solely for performing an abortion in that state.

(2) The person is licensed or certified to practice nurse-midwifery in another state and was convicted in that state for an offense related solely to the performance of an abortion in that state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 565, Sec. 2.   (AB 2626)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.7.

An applicant for certification pursuant to this article shall submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board, accompanied by the fee prescribed by Section 2815.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1407.)
-------------------------------------------

2746.8.

(a) Each certificate issued pursuant to this article shall be renewable biennially, and each person holding a certificate under this article shall apply for a renewal of the certificate and pay the biennial renewal fee required by Section 2815.5 every two years on or before the last day of the month following the month in which their birthday occurs, beginning with the second birthday following the date on which the certificate was issued, whereupon the board shall renew the certificate.

(b) Each certificate that is not renewed in accordance with this section shall expire, but may, within a period of eight years, be reinstated upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and penalty fee required by Section 2815.5 and submission
 of proof of the applicant’s qualifications as may be required by the board. During the eight-year period, no examination shall be required as a condition for the reinstatement of an expired certificate that has lapsed solely by reason of nonpayment of the renewal fee. After the expiration of the eight-year period, the board may require, as a condition of reinstatement, that the applicant pass an examination as it deems necessary to determine the applicant’s present fitness to resume the practice of nurse-midwifery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 32.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disciplinary Proceedings [2750. - 2765.]

2750.

Every certificate holder or licensee, including licensees holding temporary licenses, or licensees holding licenses placed in an inactive status, may be disciplined as provided in this article. As used in this article, “license” includes certificate, registration, or any other authorization to engage in practice regulated by this chapter. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1275, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2751.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may, in its discretion, accept the surrender of a license through a stipulated agreement in the absence of a pleading when the ability of a registered nurse to practice nursing safely is impaired due to mental or physical illness.

(b) This alternative proceeding shall apply only to cases that would otherwise have been processed pursuant to Section 820.

(c) Until the time that the licensee signs the stipulated agreement for license surrender, he or she may elect to have the disciplinary process conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The stipulated agreement in this alternative proceeding shall specify that:

(1) The license surrender shall be public information and shall be considered a disciplinary action.

(2) The licensee may petition the board for reinstatement after a period of not less than one year after the effective date of the decision.

(3) Any reinstatement proceeding shall be conducted pursuant to Section 2760.1.

(4) Upon seeking reinstatement, it is the responsibility of the former licensee to submit competent evidence of the ability to safely and competently practice as a registered nurse.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1011, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2759.

The board shall discipline the holder of any license, whose default has been entered or who has been heard by the board and found guilty, by any of the following methods:

(a) Suspending judgment.

(b) Placing upon them probation.

(c) Suspending their right to practice nursing for a period not exceeding one year.

(d) Revoking their license.

(e) Taking other action in relation to disciplining them as the board in its discretion may deem proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 33.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2760.

(a) If the holder of a license is suspended, they shall not be entitled to practice nursing during the term of suspension.

(b) Upon expiration of the term of suspension, they shall be reinstated by the board and shall be entitled to resume the practice of nursing unless it is established to the satisfaction of the board that they have practiced nursing in this state during the term of suspension. In this event, the board shall revoke their license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 34.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2760.1.

(a) A registered nurse whose license has been revoked or suspended or who has been placed on probation may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including reduction or termination of probation, after a period not less than the following minimum periods has elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action, or if the order of the board or any portion of it is stayed by the board itself or by the superior court, from the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety, or for a registered nurse whose initial license application is subject to a disciplinary decision, from the date the initial license was issued:

(1) Except
 as otherwise provided in this section, at least three years for reinstatement of a license that was revoked, except that the board may, in its sole discretion, specify in its order a lesser period of time provided that the period shall be not less than one year.

(2) At least two years for early termination of a probation period of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(b) The board shall give notice to the Attorney General of the filing of the petition. The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the
 hearing on the petition, and an opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board. The petitioner shall at all times have the burden of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that he or she is entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(c) The hearing may be continued from time to time as the board deems appropriate.

(d) (1) The petition may be heard by the board or the board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(2) If the board assigns the petition to an administrative law judge, the administrative law judge shall submit a proposed
 decision, as specified in Section 11517 of the Government Code, to the board for its consideration, which shall include reasons supporting the proposed decision.

(e) The board may grant or deny the petition, or may impose any terms and conditions that it reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction of penalty.

(f) In considering a petition for reinstatement or modification of a penalty, the board or the administrative law judge shall evaluate and consider evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the petitioner using criteria specified in regulations promulgated by the board.

(g) The board may impose, or the administrative law judge may recommend, terms and conditions on the
 petitioner in reinstating a license, certificate, or permit or in modifying a penalty.

(h) The petitioner shall provide a current set of fingerprints accompanied by the necessary fingerprinting fee.

(i) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole, or subject to an order of registration pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(j) Except in those cases where the petitioner has been disciplined pursuant to Section 822, the board may in its discretion deny
 without hearing or argument any petition that is filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of a prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 8.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2761.

The board may take disciplinary action against a certified or licensed nurse or deny an application for a certificate or license for any of the following:

(a) Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Incompetence or gross negligence in carrying out usual certified or licensed nursing functions.

(2) A conviction of practicing medicine without a license in violation of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), in which event the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(3) The use of advertising relating to nursing that violates Section 17500.

(4) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action against a health care professional license or certificate by another state or territory of the United States, by any other government agency, or by another California health care professional licensing board. A certified copy of the decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(b) Procuring their certificate or license by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake. 

(c) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violating of, or conspiring to violate any provision or term of
 this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to it.

(d) Making or giving any false statement or information in connection with the application for issuance of a certificate or
 license.

(e) Conviction of a felony or of any offense substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a registered nurse, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required under this chapter for the issuance of a certificate or license.

(g) Impersonating another certified or licensed practitioner, or permitting or allowing another person to use their certificate or license for the purpose of nursing the sick or afflicted.

(h) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or
 persons, whether a licensed physician or not, in the performance of, or arranging for, a violation of any of the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) of Chapter 5.

(i) Holding oneself out to the public or to any practitioner of the healing arts as a nurse practitioner or as meeting the standards established by the board for a nurse practitioner unless meeting the standards established by the board pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) or holding oneself out to the public as being certified by the board as a nurse anesthetist, nurse midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or public health nurse unless the person is at the time certified by the board.

(j) (1) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to
 follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from licensed or certified nurse to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensed or certified nurse. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, and
 the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.

(2) The board shall seek to ensure that licentiates and others regulated by the board are informed of the responsibility of licentiates to minimize the risk of transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from health care provider to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to health care provider, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risks of transmission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 6.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2761.1.

(a) The board shall not suspend or revoke the certification or license of a nurse practitioner solely for performing an abortion if the holder performed the abortion in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Sections 141, 480, 490, and 2761, the board shall not deny an application for certification or licensure as a nurse practitioner, or suspend, revoke, or otherwise impose discipline upon a person certified or licensed in this state as a nurse
 practitioner under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The person is licensed or certified as a nurse practitioner in another state and was disciplined in that state solely for performing an abortion in that state.

(2) The person is licensed or certified as a nurse practitioner in another state and was convicted in that state for an offense related solely to the performance of an abortion in that state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 2626)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2761.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for a study of reporting mechanisms to the board so that it can identify methods of receiving timely information on nurses who may have violated this chapter. The California Research Bureau shall prepare and deliver a report to the Legislature by January 1, 2019, that evaluates to what extent employers voluntarily report disciplined nurses to the board and offers options for consistent and reasonable reporting mechanisms. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A review of existing mandatory reporting requirements that alert the board to nurses who may have violated this chapter.

(b) A review of existing laws permitting,
 prohibiting, encouraging, or discouraging voluntary reporting to the board.

(c) An analysis of the number of employer reports to the board, the number of those reports investigated by the board, and the final action taken by the board for each report.

(d) Employer reporting requirements of other boards within the department.

(e) Nursing reporting requirements of other states.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 520, Sec. 5.   (SB 799)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2762.

In addition to other acts constituting unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this chapter, it is unprofessional conduct for a person licensed under this chapter to do any of the following:

(a) Obtain or possess in violation of law, or prescribe, or except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist administer to themselves, or furnish or administer to another, any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code or any dangerous drug or dangerous device as defined in Section 4022.

(b) Use any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and
 Safety Code, or any dangerous drug or dangerous device as defined in Section 4022, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to themselves, any other person, or the public or to the extent that such use impairs their ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by their license.

(c) Be convicted of a criminal offense involving the prescription, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, or the possession of, or falsification of a record pertaining to, the substances described in subdivision (a) of this section, in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.

(d) Be committed or confined by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of or addiction to the use of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a)
 and (b) of this section, in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence of such commitment or confinement.

(e) Falsify, or make grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital, patient, or other record pertaining to the substances described in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 36.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2764.

The lapsing or suspension of a license by operation of law or by order or decision of the board or a court of law, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licentiate shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation of or action or disciplinary proceeding against such license, or to render a decision suspending or revoking such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

2765.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a registered nurse is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license or certificate suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license or certificate, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or
 indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 37.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.1. Intervention Program [2770. - 2770.14.]

2770.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Board of Registered Nursing seek ways and means to identify and rehabilitate registered nurses whose competency may be impaired due to abuse of alcohol and other drugs, or due to mental illness so that registered nurses so afflicted may be rehabilitated and returned to the practice of nursing in a manner that will not endanger the public health and safety. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the Board of Registered Nursing shall implement this legislation by establishing an intervention program as a voluntary alternative to traditional disciplinary actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 22.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Board” means the Board of Registered Nursing.

(b) “Committee” means an intervention evaluation committee created by this article.

(c) “Program manager” means the staff manager of the intervention program, as designated by the executive officer of the board. The program manager shall have background experience in dealing with substance abuse issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 23.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.2.

(a) One or more intervention evaluation committees is hereby created in the state to be established by the board. Each committee shall be composed of five persons appointed by the board. No board member shall serve on any committee.

(b) Each committee shall have the following composition:

(1) Three registered nurses, holding active California licenses, who have demonstrated expertise in the field of chemical dependency or psychiatric nursing.

(2) One physician, holding an active California license, who specializes in the diagnosis and treatment of
 addictive diseases or mental illness.

(3) One public member who is knowledgeable in the field of chemical dependency or mental illness.

(c) It shall require a majority vote of the board to appoint a person to a committee. Each appointment shall be at the pleasure of the board for a term not to exceed four years. In its discretion the board may stagger the terms of the initial members appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 24.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.3.

Each member of a committee shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.4.

Three members of a committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting. Any action requires a majority vote of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.5.

Each committee shall elect from its membership a chairperson and a vice chairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.6.

The board shall administer the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.7.

(a) The board shall establish criteria for the acceptance, denial, or termination of registered nurses in the intervention program. Only those registered nurses who have voluntarily requested to participate in the intervention program shall participate in the program.

(b) A registered nurse under current investigation by the board may request entry into the intervention program by contacting the board. Before authorizing a registered nurse to enter into the intervention program, the board may require the registered nurse under current investigation for any violations of this chapter or any other provision of this code to execute a statement of understanding that states that the registered nurse understands that any violations that would otherwise be the basis for
 discipline may still be investigated and may be the subject of disciplinary action in accordance with this section.

(c) (1) Neither acceptance nor participation in the intervention program shall preclude the board from investigating or continuing to investigate, or, except as provided in this subdivision, taking disciplinary action or continuing to take disciplinary action against, any registered nurse for any unprofessional conduct committed before, during, or after participation in the intervention program.

(2) The board may investigate at its discretion complaints against registered nurses participating in the intervention program.

(3) Disciplinary action with regard to acts committed before or during participation in the intervention program shall not take place unless the registered nurse
 withdraws or is terminated from the program.

(d) All registered nurses shall sign an agreement of understanding that the withdrawal or termination from the intervention program at a time when the program manager or intervention evaluation committee determines the licentiate presents a threat to the public’s health and safety shall result in the utilization by the board of intervention program treatment records in disciplinary or criminal proceedings.

(e) Any registered nurse terminated from the intervention program for failure to comply with program requirements is subject to disciplinary action by the board for acts committed before, during, and after participation in the intervention program. A registered nurse who has been under investigation by the board and has been terminated from the intervention program by an intervention evaluation committee shall be reported by the
 intervention evaluation committee to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 39.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.8.

A committee created under this article operates under the direction of the intervention program manager. The program manager has the primary responsibility to review and evaluate recommendations of the committee. Each committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(a) To evaluate those registered nurses who request participation in the program according to the guidelines prescribed by the board, and to make recommendations.

(b) To review and designate those treatment services to which registered nurses in an intervention program may be referred.

(c) To receive
 and review information concerning a registered nurse participating in the program.

(d) To consider in the case of each registered nurse participating in a program whether he or she may with safety continue or resume the practice of nursing.

(e) To call meetings as necessary to consider the requests of registered nurses to participate in an intervention program, and to consider reports regarding registered nurses participating in a program.

(f) To make recommendations to the program manager regarding the terms and conditions of the intervention agreement for each registered nurse participating in the program, including treatment, supervision, and monitoring requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 26.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.9.

The committee shall inform each registered nurse who requests participation in a program of the procedures followed in the program, of the rights and responsibilities of the registered nurse in the program, and of the possible results of noncompliance with the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.10.

Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to public meetings, a committee may convene in closed session to consider reports pertaining to any registered nurse requesting or participating in an intervention program. A committee shall only convene in closed session to the extent that it is necessary to protect the privacy of such a licentiate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 27.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.11.

(a) Each registered nurse who requests participation in an intervention program shall agree to cooperate with the rehabilitation program designed by the committee and approved by the program manager. Any failure to comply with a rehabilitation program may result in termination of the registered nurse’s participation in a program. The name and license number of a registered nurse who is terminated for any reason, other than successful completion, shall be reported to the board’s enforcement program.

(b) If the program manager determines that a registered nurse, who is denied admission into the program or terminated from the program, presents a threat to the public or their own health and safety, the program manager shall report the name and license number, along
 with a copy of all intervention program records for that registered nurse, to the board’s enforcement program. The board may use any of the records it receives under this subdivision in any disciplinary proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 38.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.12.
